dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="יי/ן__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ננו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נות</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נות</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיי</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותינו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותייך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיהן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נותיהם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="חשבון"><i>חשבו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לגיון"><i>לגיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיגיון"><i>שיגיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גירעון"><i>גירעו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ששון"><i>ששו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שוויון"><i>שוויו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דורון"><i>דורו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניצחון"><i>ניצחו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיבעון"><i>קיבעו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיקדון"><i>פיקדו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זיכרון"><i>זיכרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אילן"><i>איל</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיברון"><i>שיברו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פדיון"><i>פדיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פגיון"><i>פגיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דיראון"><i>דיראו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ביטחון"><i>ביטחו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רישיון"><i>רישיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיליון"><i>גיליו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ממון"><i>ממו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רפיון"><i>רפיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מגדן"><i>מגד</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סירחון"><i>סירחו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בדיון"><i>בדיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אסון"><i>אסו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קרבן"><i>קרב</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיתיון"><i>פיתיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משכון"><i>משכו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הרמון"><i>הרמו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זיכיון"><i>זיכיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניסיון"><i>ניסיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיטפון"><i>שיטפו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רצון"><i>רצו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כפיון"><i>כפיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ארון"><i>ארו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ארמון"><i>ארמו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כישרון"><i>כישרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיתון"><i>קיתו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דמיון"><i>דמיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיגעון"><i>שיגעו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עלבון"><i>עלבו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עוון"><i>עוו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קרון"><i>קרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מעון"><i>מעו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שלטון"><i>שלטו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חלון"><i>חלו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שולחן"><i>שולח</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיגרון"><i>שיגרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פירעון"><i>פירעו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיזבון"><i>עיזבו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ביזיון"><i>ביזיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיצבון"><i>עיצבו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סמפון"><i>סמפו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כישלון"><i>כישלו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניכיון"><i>ניכיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קלון"><i>קלו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גרון"><i>גרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יין"><i>יי</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חזון"><i>חזו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מזון"><i>מזו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רעיון"><i>רעיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חורבן"><i>חורב</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יתרון"><i>יתרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לצון"><i>לצו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניקיון"><i>ניקיו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דיכאון"><i>דיכאו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סגנון"><i>סגנו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קמרון"><i>קמרו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זדון"><i>זדו</i><par n="יי/ן__n_m"/></e>
